projects/basic-m/basic-m.lexc
!Multichar_Symbols +n +pn +sg +pl +num +case +acc +nom +1 +%0 +agr +tense +past +pres

LEXICON Root

Noun ;
PNoun ;
Verb ;
Det ;
RelPron ;
Conj ;

LEXICON Noun

spy   NCat;
cat   NCat;
dog	  NCat;
city  NCat;
fox   NCat;
panic NCat;
try   NCat;
watch NCat;

LEXICON PNoun

john PNCat;
mary PNCat;
alex PNCat;

LEXICON NCat

+n:0 NNum;

LEXICON PNCat

+pn+sg+num:0 PNCase;

LEXICON NNum
+sg+num:0 #;
+pl+num:^s #;

LEXICON PNCase

+acc+case:0 #;
+nom+case:0 #;

LEXICON Verb

talk  VCat;
walk  VCat;
sleep VCat;
like  VCat;
beg   VCat;
make  VCat;
panic VCat;
try   VCat;
watch VCat;
persuade VCat;
promise VCat;
chase VCat;

LEXICON VCat

+v:0 #;
+v:0 VAgr;

LEXICON VAgr

+1p+agr+pres+tense:0  #;
+3p+agr+pres+tense:^s  #;
+1p+agr+past+tense:^ed #;
+3p+agr+past+tense:^ed #;

LEXICON Det

the   DCat;
every DCat; 
some  DCat; 
no    DCat;
a DCat;

LEXICON DCat

+d:0 #;

LEXICON RelPron

who RelPronCat;
whom RelPronCat;
which RelPronCat;
that RelPronCat;

LEXICON RelPronCat
+rel:0 #;

LEXICON Conj
and ConjCat;
or ConjCat;

LEXICON ConjCat
+conj:0 #;
